Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.531

Declaration of police power.

It is hereby declared that this chapter is enacted as an exercise of the police power of the state of Washington for the preservation of the public health and each and every section thereof shall be construed as having been intended to effect such purpose and not as having been intended to affect any regulation or restraint of commerce between the several states which may by the Constitution of the United States of America have been reserved to the congress thereof.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.32.900. Prior: 1919 c 192 s 83; RRS s 6245. Formerly RCW 15.32.900.]